California statutes. Public Resources Code
(D) The pilot project recycler shall accept and pay the refund value for all eligible beverage container types.

(E) The pilot project operator shall notify the department in writing 10 calendar days before any change of the location where redeemed empty beverage containers are stored.

(F) The pilot project recycler shall only redeem eligible empty beverage container material purchased from consumers for recycling, and
 shall not accept material from any other certified or noncertified person or entity, including, but not limited to, recycling centers, dropoff or collection programs, curbside programs, and processors.

(G) The pilot project operator shall keep separate transaction records for each location within the pilot project, and in the case of mobile collection programs, separate transaction records for each location served by the mobile unit.

(6) A processor shall not issue an authorization to cancel under subdivision (b) of Section 2110 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations to a pilot project recycler.

(7) Additional requirements as deemed necessary by the department.

(d) A pilot project established pursuant to this section may provide stationary dropoff locations or mobile collection programs.

(e) A jurisdiction that opts to be served by a pilot project shall submit its pilot project proposal to the department for approval. The proposal shall include all of the following elements:

(1) A map of the pilot project area, including intended locations for pilot project recyclers.

(2) A list of proposed operators of pilot project recyclers.

(3) Contact information for the jurisdiction.

(4) Planned dates of operation.

(5) A description of how the pilot project will meet the requirements of this section.

(6) Additional elements as determined by the department.

(f) The department may issue probationary certificates of operation to pilot project recyclers participating in an approved pilot project. A certificate issued under this section shall be valid, and shall specify that the certificate is valid, for a period of not more than five years or until the end of the pilot project, whichever comes first. Notwithstanding certification requirements imposed by this division or implementing regulations, the following
 application review timelines shall apply to pilot projects:

(1) The department shall notify each applicant and the appropriate pilot project contact within 30 calendar days of receipt of the proposal, or receipt of additional information if the proposal was initially deemed incomplete, that the proposal for certification is either complete and accepted for further review or incomplete and the reasons for incompleteness.

(2) Upon determining that a proposal is complete, the department shall notify the applicant and appropriate pilot project contact in writing within 30 calendar days that the application is either approved with probationary status or denied and the reasons for denial.

(g) In approving pilot
 projects, the department shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) The number of unserved convenience zones that will be served by the pilot project.

(2) The total number of hours per week the pilot project recycler will operate.

(3) The total number of locations that will be served under the pilot project.

(4) Whether the jurisdiction has actively prevented the siting or operation of a certified recycling center at a supermarket site.

(5) The geographic distribution of jurisdictions proposing a pilot project.

(6) Potential impacts to existing certified recycling centers.

(7) Additional factors deemed relevant by the department.

(h) (1) The department may revoke the approval of a pilot project or the associated probationary certification of a pilot project recycler participating in the pilot project, or both, at any time if the jurisdiction or pilot project operator fails to meet the conditions outlined in the department’s approval of the application or violates this division or a regulation adopted under this division, except as to violations of the division or regulations that are inconsistent with the operation of an approved pilot project. If the department revokes a probationary certification of a pilot project recycler, the department may require the jurisdiction or
 the pilot project operator to take the steps necessary to ensure that the pilot project achieves its goals consistent with the approved pilot project application.

(2) If the approval of a pilot project is revoked, the review process described in Section 14571.7 shall apply to each convenience zone that was a part of the pilot project.

(i) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14585, a pilot project recycler that has been certified by the department on a probationary basis under an approved pilot project shall be eligible to apply for handling fees under Section 14585 and to receive from certified processors the amounts specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14573.5 for refund values, administrative costs, and processing payments.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14585, the existence of a pilot project recycler shall not affect the handling fee eligibility of a recycling center.

(3) For purposes of handling fee eligibility, a pilot project recycler may be located anywhere within a pilot project area.

(j) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section. Emergency regulations, if adopted, shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office
 of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Emergency regulations adopted under this section shall be filed with, but not be repealed by, the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect until amended or repealed by the department or January 1, 2034, whichever comes first.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(l) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2034, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 27) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 182, Sec. 2.   (SB 1113)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14572.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a certified recycling center shall accept from any consumer or dropoff or collection program any empty beverage container, and shall pay to the consumer or dropoff or collection program the refund value of the beverage container.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the recycling center may pay the refund value based on the weight of returned containers.

(3) On and after September 1, 2013, for beverage containers redeemed by consumers, a certified recycling center shall pay the refund value using the applicable segregated rate, as defined in
 paragraph (43) of subsection (a) of Section 2000 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on September 1, 2013, which shall be based on the weight of the redeemed beverage containers.

(b) Any recycling center or processor that was in existence on January 1, 1986, and that refused, as of January 1, 1986, to accept at a particular location a certain type of empty beverage container may continue to refuse to accept at the location the type or types of empty beverage containers that the recycling center or processor refused to accept as of January 1, 1986. A certified recycling center that refuses, pursuant to this subdivision, to accept a certain type or types of empty beverage containers is not eligible to receive handling fees unless the center agrees to accept all types of empty beverage containers and is a supermarket site. This subdivision does not preclude the certified recycling center from receiving a
 handling fee for beverage containers redeemed at supermarket sites that do accept all types of containers.

(c) The department shall develop procedures by which recycling centers and processors that meet the criteria of subdivision (b) may recertify to change the material types accepted.

(d) (1) Only a certified recycling center may pay the refund value to consumers or dropoff or collection programs. A person shall not pay a noncertified recycler for empty beverage containers an amount that exceeds the current scrap value for each container type, which shall be determined in the following manner:

(A) For a plastic or glass beverage container, the current scrap value shall be determined by the department.

(B) For an aluminum beverage
 container, the current scrap value shall be not greater than the amount paid to the processor for that aluminum beverage container, on the date the container was purchased, by the location of end use, as defined in the regulations of the department.

(2) A person shall not receive or retain, for empty beverage containers that come from out of state, any refund values, processing payments, or administrative fees for which a claim is made to the department against the fund.

(3) Paragraph (1) does not affect curbside programs under contract with cities or counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 20.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14572.1.

(a) A dealer delivering empty beverage containers received from the public to a certified recycling center or processor for recycling pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14578 is not subject to the daily load limits established pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2535 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 28) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 29.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14572.5.

A certified recycling center, other than a reverse vending machine, shall accept from any consumer or any dropoff or collection program and pay the applicable deposit for any refillable empty beer and other malt beverage container. The certified recycling center shall return, or cause to be returned, the refillable beer and other malt beverage container to the beer and other malt beverage distributor or any willing purchaser, who shall then pay the deposit to the center. The beer and other malt beverage distributor or other purchaser shall also negotiate a handling fee with the recycling center for the return of these containers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 34.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14573.

(a) The department shall pay to a processor, for every empty beverage container received by the processor from a certified recycling center, curbside program, or dropoff or collection program, upon presentation of a completed processor invoice accompanied by a shipping report from the supplier of the material, in the form adopted by the department, the sum of all of the following amounts:

(1) The refund value.

(2) Two and one-half percent of the refund value for administrative costs.

(3) The processing payment established pursuant to Section 14575.

(b) The department shall make the payment required in subdivision (a) within two working days of the date that the department is notified of the delivery or within the time determined by the department to be necessary and adequate. If the payment is not made by the Controller to the certified processor within 20 working days of receipt of the claims schedule, the Controller shall pay the processor interest at the current prime lending rate for any period in excess of these 20 working days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 815, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14573.1.

(a) (1) In addition to other payments authorized by this division, the department shall pay to a recycling center that is a rural region recycler, as defined in Section 14525.5.1, or that is located in a rural county, as defined in Section 40184, a transportation, operations, and logistics payment of sixty dollars ($60) per ton for glass containers.

(2) If the department determines that there are insufficient funds to make the payments described in paragraph (1) and the payments described in Sections 14575 and 14581, then the department shall reduce the payments described in paragraph (1) before making any reductions to the payments described in Sections 14575 and 14581.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for expenditure without regard to fiscal year for the purposes described in this subdivision.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 10.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14573.5.

(a) Except as provided in Section 14573.6, a processor shall pay, by check or electronic transfer, to a certified recycling center, dropoff or collection program, or curbside program, for all types of empty beverage containers, by type of beverage container, received by the processor from a recycling center, curbside program, or dropoff or collection program, upon receipt by the certified processor of a shipping report from the supplier of the material, in the form adopted by the regulations adopted by the department. A processor shall not make the payment in cash. The payment shall include the sum of all of the following amounts:

(1) The refund value.

(2) Three-fourths of 1 percent of the refund value for administrative costs.

(3) The processing payment established pursuant to Section 14575.

(b) The processor shall make the payment required in subdivision (a) within two working days of the date that the processor receives these empty beverage containers, or within the time which the department determines to be necessary and adequate. Under the procedures authorized by the department, the department may authorize a certified recycling center to cancel containers, and a certified processor may authorize a certified recycling center to cancel containers on behalf of the certified processor.

(c) If the department has set up an accounts receivable procedure or other procedure for seeking the payment of money improperly obtained by a certified recycling center from the fund, the department may reimburse the processor for its payments to that certified recycling center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 977, Sec. 2.   (SB 38)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14573.51.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, recycling centers and processors shall not pay curbside programs more than the applicable statewide average curbside commingled rate unless the curbside program has received an individual commingled rate from the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The department may establish a procedure whereby the operators of curbside programs may apply for an individual commingled rate for any material or types with or without a statewide commingled rate, including, but not limited to, glass, aluminum, bimetal, or any of the individual plastic resin types or combination of resin types identified by resin identification codes under Section 18015. These procedures shall require, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The individual rate shall be valid for no more than one year from the date the individual rate is authorized.

(2) The methodology used by the operator of the curbside program to determine the commingled rate shall be approved by the department, in advance.

(c) Curbside programs that have acquired an individual commingled rate, pursuant to this section, shall not be surveyed by the department to determine the statewide average curbside commingled rate during the period the individual commingled rate is effective.

(d) The department may enter into a contract for the services required to implement the amendments to this section made by the act of the first half of the 2003–04 Regular Session of the Legislature amending this section. The department may not expend more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for each year of the contract. The contract shall be paid only from revenues derived from redemption payments and processing fees paid on plastic beverage containers displaying the resin identification code “3,” “4,” “5,” “6,” or “7” pursuant to Section 18015. If the department determines that insufficient funds will be available from these revenues, after refund values are paid to processors and the reduction is made in the processing fee pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14575 for these containers, the department may determine not to calculate a commingled rate pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 753, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14573.6.

No dropoff or collection program shall pay any refund value to the consumer, and a dropoff or collection program is not eligible to receive any sum paid pursuant to Section 14573 or 14573.5 for administrative costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 37.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14573.7.

Notwithstanding Sections 14573 and 14573.5, the department may require a recycling center, pursuant to a prepayment review taken pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14552, to submit consumer transaction logs and consumer transaction receipts as support documentation for shipping reports submitted to processors. The department may, pursuant to this section, authorize a processor to withhold refund value payments to a recycling center. The department may suspend the certification of a recycling center without a hearing if the recycling center fails to comply with the documental submittal requirements of this section, upon providing notice of these requirements. The recycling center which is the subject of the suspension may then request a hearing on the suspension, but the request for a hearing shall not stay the suspension. A hearing requested pursuant to this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1069, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

14574.

(a) (1) A distributor of beverage containers shall pay to the department the redemption payment for every beverage container, other than a refillable beverage container, sold or transferred to a dealer, less 1.5 percent for the distributor’s administrative costs.

(2) The payment made by a distributor shall be made not later than the last day of the month following the sale. The distributor shall make the payment in the form and manner that the department prescribes.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if a distributor displays a pattern of operation in compliance with this division and the regulations adopted
 pursuant to this division, to the satisfaction of the department, the distributor may make a single annual payment of redemption payments, if the distributor’s projected redemption payment for a calendar year totals less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

(2) An annual redemption payment made pursuant to this subdivision is due and payable on or before February 1 for every beverage container sold or transferred by the distributor to a dealer in the previous calendar year.

(3) A distributor shall notify the department of its intent to make an annual redemption payment pursuant to this subdivision on or before January 31 of the calendar year for which the payment will be due.

(c) This section shall become effective on July 1, 2012.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 262) by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 94.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2012, pursuant to its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14575.

(a) If any type of empty beverage container with a refund value established pursuant to Section 14560 has a scrap value less than the cost of recycling, the department shall, on January 1, 2000, and on or before January 1 annually thereafter, establish a processing fee and a processing payment for the container by the type of the material of the container.

(b) The processing payment shall be at least equal to the difference between the scrap value offered to a statistically significant sample of recyclers by willing purchasers, and except for the initial calculation made pursuant to subdivision (d), the sum of both of the following:

(1) The actual cost for certified recycling centers, excluding centers
 receiving a handling fee, of receiving, handling, storing, transporting, and maintaining equipment for each container sold for recycling or, only if the container is not recyclable, the actual cost of disposal, calculated pursuant to subdivision (c). The department shall determine the statewide weighted average cost to recycle each beverage container type, which shall serve as the actual recycling costs for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), by conducting a survey of the costs of a statistically significant sample of certified recycling centers, excluding those recycling centers receiving a handling fee, for receiving, handling, storing, transporting, and maintaining equipment.

(2) A reasonable financial return for recycling centers.

(c) The department shall base the processing payment pursuant to this section upon all of the following:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), for calculating processing payments that will be in effect on and after January 1, 2004, the department shall determine the actual costs for certified recycling centers, every second year, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). The department shall adjust the recycling costs annually to reflect changes in the cost of living, as measured by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or a successor agency of the United States government.

(2) On and after January 1, 2010, the department shall use the most recently published, measured actual costs of recycling for a specific beverage container material type if the department determines the number of beverage containers for that material type that is returned for recycling pursuant to Section 14551, based on the most recently published calendar year number of
 beverage containers returned for recycling, is less than 5 percent of the total number of beverage containers returned for recycling for all material types. The department shall determine the actual recycling cost to be used for calculating processing payments for those beverage containers in the following manner:

(A) The department shall adjust the costs of recycling that material type every second year by the percentage change in the most recently measured cost of recycling HDPE plastic beverage containers, as determined by the department. The department shall use the percentage change in costs of recycling HDPE plastic beverage containers for this purpose, even if HDPE plastic beverage containers are less than 5 percent of the total volume of returned beverage containers.

(B) The department shall adjust the recycling costs annually for that material type to reflect changes in
 the cost of living, as measured by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor or a successor agency of the United States government.

(d) Except as specified in subdivision (e), the actual processing fee paid by a beverage manufacturer shall equal 65 percent of the processing payment calculated pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) The department, consistent with Section 14581 and subject to the availability of funds, shall reduce the processing fee paid by beverage manufacturers by expending funds in each material processing fee account, in the following manner:

(1) On January 1, 2005, and annually thereafter, the processing fee shall equal the following amounts:

(A) Ten percent of the processing payment for a container type with
 a recycling rate equal to or greater than 75 percent.

(B) Eleven percent of the processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate equal to or greater than 65 percent, but less than 75 percent.

(C) Twelve percent of the processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate equal to or greater than 60 percent, but less than 65 percent.

(D) Thirteen percent of the processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate equal to or greater than 55 percent, but less than 60 percent.

(E) Fourteen percent of the processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate equal to or greater than 50 percent, but less than 55 percent.

(F) Fifteen percent of the
 processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate equal to or greater than 45 percent, but less than 50 percent.

(G) Eighteen percent of the processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate equal to or greater than 40 percent, but less than 45 percent.

(H) Twenty percent of the processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate equal to or greater than 30 percent, but less than 40 percent.

(I) Sixty-five percent of the processing payment for a container type with a recycling rate less than 30 percent.

(2) The department shall calculate the recycling rate for purposes of paragraph (1) based on the 12-month period ending on June 30 that directly precedes the date of the January 1 processing fee determination.

(f) Not more than once every three months, the department may make an adjustment in the amount of the processing payment established pursuant to this section for any beverage container, based on the applicable preceding 12-month average scrap value or the preceding 3-month average scrap value, whichever is lower. Quarterly adjustments made pursuant to this subdivision shall not cause a change in the annual January 1 processing fee established by this section.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), every beverage manufacturer shall pay to the department the applicable processing fee for each container sold or transferred to a distributor or dealer within 40 days of the sale in the form and in the manner that the department may prescribe.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding
 Section 14506, with respect to the payment of processing fees for beer and other malt beverages manufactured outside the state, the beverage manufacturer shall be deemed to be the person or entity named on the certificate of compliance issued pursuant to Section 23671 of the Business and Professions Code. With respect to the payment of processing fees for beverages manufactured outside the state and sold directly to consumers within the state with a direct shipper permit, the beverage manufacturer shall be deemed to be the person or entity named on the direct shipper permit issued pursuant to Section 23661.3 of the Business and Professions Code, and shall be responsible for paying to the department the total processing fee payment for all sales and transfers made directly to consumers in the state. If the department is unable to collect the processing fee from the person or entity named on the certificate of compliance or direct shipper permit, the department shall give written notice by certified mail,
 return receipt requested, to that person or entity. The notice shall state that the processing fee shall be remitted in full within 30 days of issuance of the notice or the person or entity shall not be permitted to offer that beverage brand for sale within the state. If the person or entity fails to remit the processing fee within 30 days of issuance of the notice, the department shall notify the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control that the certificate holder has failed to comply, and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall prohibit the offering for sale of that beverage brand within the state.

(B) The department shall enter into a contract with the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, pursuant to Section 14536.5, concerning the implementation of this paragraph, which shall include a provision reimbursing the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for its costs incurred in implementing this paragraph.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a beverage manufacturer displays a pattern of operation in compliance with this division and the regulations adopted pursuant to this division, to the satisfaction of the department, the beverage manufacturer may make a single annual payment of processing fees, if the beverage manufacturer meets either of the following conditions:

(i) If the redemption payment and refund value is not increased pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14560, the beverage manufacturer’s projected processing fees for a calendar year total less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(ii) If the redemption payment and refund value is increased pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14560, the beverage manufacturer’s projected processing fees for a
 calendar year total less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(B) An annual processing fee payment made pursuant to this paragraph is due and payable on or before February 1 for every beverage container sold or transferred by the beverage manufacturer to a distributor or dealer in the previous calendar year.

(C) A beverage manufacturer shall notify the department of its intent to make an annual processing fee payment pursuant to this paragraph on or before January 31 of the calendar year for which the payment will be due.

(4) The department shall pay the processing payments on redeemed containers to processors, in the same manner as it pays refund values pursuant to Sections 14573 and 14573.5. The processor shall pay the recycling center the entire processing payment representing the actual costs and financial
 return incurred by the recycling center, as specified in subdivision (b).

(h) When assessing processing fees pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall assess the processing fee on each container sold, as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), by the type of material of the container, assuming that every container sold will be redeemed for recycling, whether or not the container is actually recycled.

(i) The container manufacturer, or a designated agent, shall pay to, or credit, the account of the beverage manufacturer in an amount equal to the processing fee.

(j) If, at the end of any calendar year for which glass recycling rates equal or exceed 45 percent and sufficient surplus funds remain in the glass processing fee account to make the reduction pursuant to this subdivision or if, at the end of any calendar
 year for which PET recycling rates equal or exceed 45 percent and sufficient surplus funds remain in the PET processing fee account to make the reduction pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall use these surplus funds in the respective processing fee accounts in the following calendar year to reduce the amount of the processing fee that would otherwise be due from glass or PET beverage manufacturers pursuant to this subdivision.

(1) The department shall reduce the glass or PET processing fee amount pursuant to this subdivision in addition to any reduction for which the glass or PET beverage container qualifies under subdivision (e).

(2) The department shall determine the processing fee reduction by dividing two million dollars ($2,000,000) from each processing fee account by an estimate of the number of containers sold or transferred to a distributor during the previous
 calendar year, based upon the latest available data.

(k) (1) Commencing January 1, 2024, a processing fee equivalent to the processing fee applied to HDPE beverage containers shall be applied to a beverage container that is a box, bladder, or pouch, or similar container, containing wine or distilled spirits, as described in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2024, a processing payment equal to the processing payment applied to HDPE beverage containers shall be applied to a beverage container that is a box, bladder, or pouch, or similar container, containing wine or distilled spirits, as described in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 11.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14575.1.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 14575, if a willing purchaser offers to purchase empty PET containers at a voluntary artificial scrap value that is equal to the processing fee reduced pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14575 when applied to all containers sold, no processing fee shall be imposed on PET containers pursuant to Section 14575.

(b) If a willing purchaser offers to pay a voluntary artificial scrap value, the department shall, on a monthly basis, determine whether the sum of the voluntary artificial scrap value and payments made from the PET Processing Fee Account pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14575, are equal to, or more than, the recycling cost for empty PET containers determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14575.

(c) If the department determines that, for any monthly period, the sum of the voluntary artificial scrap value and payments made from the PET Processing Fee Account pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14575, is less than the recycling cost for empty PET containers, determined pursuant to Section 14575, the following requirements shall apply:

(1) The department shall immediately provide written notification of the deficiency for that monthly period and the amount of that deficiency to any willing purchaser.

(2) A willing purchaser shall correct the deficiency in the next monthly period by adjusting the voluntary artificial scrap value by an amount sufficient to equal the recycling cost for empty PET containers plus the previous monthly period’s deficiency.

(3) If the deficiency and amount in arrears is not corrected within 30 days of providing written notice to willing purchasers of empty PET containers, the department shall impose a processing fee pursuant to Section 14575 which includes any amount necessary, including any amount in arrears, to cover the cost of recycling empty PET containers.

(d) If the department determines that, for any monthly period, the sum of the voluntary artificial scrap value and payments made from the PET Processing Fee Account pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14575, is greater than the recycling cost for empty PET containers, the department shall do both of the following:

(1) Immediately provide written notification of the deviation for that monthly period and the amount of that deviation to any willing purchaser.

(2) Provide a credit equal to the amount of the deviation for any future monthly period wherein the voluntary artificial scrap value, and payments made from the PET Processing Fee Account, are less than the recycling cost of empty PET containers determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14575.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to affect any litigation that was pending on January 1, 1996, in which the department is a party of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 753, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14576.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all provisions of this division be interpreted to encourage and support the reuse, as well as the recycling, of empty beverage containers.

(b) The processing payment for a reusable beverage container shall be the same amount paid for other glass beverage containers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 502, Sec. 3.   (AB 962)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Dealer Cooperatives [14578. - 14578.5.]

14578.

(a) In any convenience zone where no recycling location has been established that satisfies the requirements of Section 14571, and in any convenience zone that has exceeded the 60-day period for the establishment of a recycling center pursuant to Section 14571.7, all dealers within that zone shall, until a recycling location is established, or a redemption program of a dealer cooperative has been approved and is operational, in that convenience zone, do either of the following:

(1) Submit to the department an affidavit form provided by the department stating that all of the following standards are being met by the dealer:

(A) The dealer redeems all empty beverage container
 types at all open cash registers or one designated location on the dealer’s premises, during all hours that the dealer is open for business.

(B) The dealer has posted signs that meet the size and location requirements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14570, and that conform to subparagraph (B) of that paragraph.

(C) The dealer is delivering, or having delivered, all empty beverage containers received from the public to a certified recycling center or processor for recycling.

(2) (A) Join a dealer cooperative to provide a dealer cooperative redemption plan to the department and implement the approved plan to provide redemption in that convenience zone pursuant to Section 14578.5. A dealer cooperative plan shall be approved by the department and operational in order for
 dealers in that convenience zone to be in compliance with this section.

(B) A dealer cooperative may create its own plan, which shall be approved by the department in order to fulfill the dealer’s obligations under this section.

(b) (1) This section does not apply to a dealer that has demonstrated to the department that the dealer has gross annual sales of less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) or is less than 5,000 square feet.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), gross annual sales do not include sales of fuel.

(3) For purposes of this chapter, an approved redemption plan may be considered operational in a specific unserved zone if the plan is fully implemented and providing redemption opportunities
 consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14578.5.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 31.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14578.5.

(a) By January 1, 2024, the department may provide one or more model dealer cooperative redemption plans for dealer cooperatives to adopt to comply with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14578 and this section.

(b) (1) By January 1, 2024, the department shall adopt emergency regulations that provide access and convenience for consumers that are comparable to subdivision (a) of Section 14571. The regulations shall include the registration process for dealers, the application and registration process for the dealer cooperative, and the process for updating information after registration as needed, and other regulations necessary for the implementation and